District of Columbia statutes.
1-716

Payments from Retirement Funds.

The District of Columbia Retirement Board shall determine the amount of any payments to be made from the funds established by this act for annuities or any other retirement or disability benefits, including refunds and lump-sum payments, and the Board shall make such payments from the appropriated fund.

Nov. 17, 1979, 93 Stat. 866, Pub. L. 96-122, § 126
Apr. 13, 2005, D.C. Law 15-354, § 3(b), 52 DCR 2638
1981 Ed., § 1-716.
1973 Ed., § 1-1816.
D.C. Law 15-354 rewrote the section which had read:
“The Mayor shall notify the Custodian of Retirement Funds of any payments to be made from the Funds established by this chapter for annuities or other retirement or disability benefits (including refunds and lump-sum payments), and the Custodian of Retirement Funds shall make such payments from the appropriate Fund.”